Georgia, session 2025_26, SB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-6-390.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to reckless
stunt driving, is amended by revising subsection (c) as follows:
"(c)(1) Any motor vehicle operated by a person who has been previously convicted of
a violation of this Code section and who is arrested and charged with a violation of this
Code section is declared to be contraband and subject to forfeiture in accordance with the
procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9 As used in this subsection, the term
'intelligent speed assistance device' means a device designed to be installed within a
motor vehicle to actively monitor and prevent the operator from exceeding a preset speed.
S. B. 160
- 1 -

LC 39 4601
Such term shall not include any technology provided by the motor vehicle manufacturer
as a component of a motor vehicle that controls or affects the speed of a motor vehicle.
(2) In any case where a vehicle which is the only family vehicle is determined to be
subject to forfeiture, the court may, if it determines that the financial hardship to the
family as a result of the forfeiture and sale outweighs the benefit to the state from such
forfeiture, order the title to the vehicle transferred to such other family member who is
a duly licensed operator and who requires the use of such vehicle for employment or
family transportation purposes. Such transfer shall be subject to any valid liens and shall
be granted only once Upon a second or subsequent conviction of a violation of this Code
section, a court shall be authorized to order the installation of an intelligent speed
assistance device upon the motor vehicle operated by the offender during such violation
when the offender is the registered owner of such motor vehicle as shown in the records
of the Department of Revenue. Such order shall set the maximum speed limit for an
intelligent speed assistance device installed upon a motor vehicle at a speed limit of no
greater than 70 miles per hour. An intelligent speed assistance device shall be installed
within ten days of the issuance of such order and remain on the vehicle for a period of
time ordered by the court which shall be no less than three months. The costs relating to
the installation of an intelligent speed assistance device upon a motor vehicle and any
monitoring thereof shall be borne by the offender. Any court which orders an intelligent
speed assistance device to be placed upon a motor vehicle pursuant to this subsection
shall provide the Department of Revenue with a copy of such order. The records of the
Department of Revenue shall contain a record reflecting that the motor vehicle shall only
be operated when equipped with a functioning intelligent speed assistance device. The
operation of a motor vehicle without an intelligent speed assistance device for which an
order for installation of an intelligent speed assistance device has been issued pursuant
to this subsection by the offender issued such order shall be punished as for a
misdemeanor."
S. B. 160
- 2 -

LC 39 4601
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 160
- 3 -